apertium-kaz.Cyrl-Arab.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%> 

%{İ%}
%{й%}
%{☭%}
%{ء%}

LEXICON Root 

:%{ء%} Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
!Exceptions ;
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
!Punct ; 
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

ы:ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ы:ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
і:і AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
І:і AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

и:и AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
И:и AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ұ:ұ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ұ:ұ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ү:ү AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ү:ү AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;

а:а AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
А:а AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ә:ә AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ә:ә AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

э:е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Э:е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
е:е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Е:е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;

о:о AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
о:о AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ө:ө AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ө:ө AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 


б:б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Б:б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
в:в AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
В:в AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
г:г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Г:г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ғ:ғ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ғ:ғ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
д:д AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Д:д AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ж:ж AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ж:ж AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
з:з AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
З:з AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
й:й AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Й:й AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
к:к AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
К:к AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
қ:қ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Қ:қ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
л:л AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Л:л AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
м:м AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
М:м AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
н:н AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Н:н AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ң:ң AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ң:ң AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
п:п AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
П:п AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
р:р AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Р:р AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
с:с AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
С:с AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
т:т AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Т:т AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ф:ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ф:ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
х:х AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Х:х AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ч:ч AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ч:ч AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ш:ш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ш:ш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
у:у AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! Often a consonant at the beginning of a word, and always treated that way in the Arabic script
У:у AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! Often a consonant at the beginning of a word, and always treated that way in the Arabic script
ъ:ъ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ъ:ъ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ь:ь AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ь:ь AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
һ:һ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Һ:һ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ц:тс AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Russian words
Ц:тс AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Russian words
щ:ш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Russian words?
Щ:ш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Russian words?
щ:шш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Kazakh words ащы, тұщы, ...
Щ:шш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Kazakh words ащы, тұщы, ...

ю:йу AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ю:йу AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
я:йа AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Я:йа AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ё:йо AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ё:йо AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

е:%{й%}е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;  ! Only after vowels
Е:%{й%}е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;  ! Only after vowels


LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
!%,:%، # ;  ! Arabic comma
!،:، # ;
!,:، # ;
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
